Rhode Island statutes. Title 3 Alcoholic Beverages
Chapter 4 Transportation of Beverages

3-4-1.
Importation orders.

Except as otherwise provided, it is unlawful to import beverages into this state. A person desiring to import beverages into this state may place with the division of taxation an order directed to a dealer for the beverage he or she desires to import and shall satisfy the division of taxation of his or her intention to pay for the merchandise. The division of taxation shall execute these orders unless doing so would involve some illegal act or the doing of an act which would be cause for the forfeiture of any license issued under this title.

All sellers, dealers, merchants, wholesalers and retailers of beverages who advertise in the state of Rhode Island, or whose advertisements are reasonably anticipated to circulate in this state shall prominently and conspicuously include within the advertisement a notice printed using a font size equal to but not larger than the font size of the largest price designation featured in the advertisement stating that the importation of beverages into the state, after purchase outside of the state, are subject to Rhode Island sales tax, and the failure to pay such tax may result in the seizure of such beverages upon entry into the state.

Any entity accepting commercial advertisements from any seller, dealer, merchant, wholesaler or retailer of beverages shall not publish such advertisement for the sale of such beverages unless the advertisement includes the notice set forth in this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1933, ch. 2013, § 39; P.L. 1934, ch. 2088, § 10; G.L. 1938, ch. 164, § 11; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 120; G.L. 1956, §

3-4-1

; P.L. 1996, ch. 100, art 36, § 6; P.L. 2007, ch. 73, art. 7, § 13.

3-4-2.
Payment of purchase price and service charges.

If the division of taxation decides to execute an order pursuant to §

3-4-1

, it may require the payment to it, with the order and the means of paying for the merchandise desired, of a reasonable sum to cover any expenses it may be put to in connection with the transaction taken in connection with other similar transactions. It is a condition precedent to the receiving of the merchandise covered by the order that the party desiring the importation has paid the division of taxation a service charge based upon the manufacturing rates set forth in §

3-10-1

provided, that if the order is placed by a licensee who engages to store the goods ordered, or any part of them, in the warehouse of the department, then the payment of the service charge may be deferred until the goods are withdrawn from the warehouse and in that case the service charge is paid before each lot or parcel is withdrawn.

History of Section.

P.L. 1933, ch. 2013, § 39; P.L. 1934, ch. 2088, § 10; G.L. 1938, ch. 164, § 11; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 120; G.L. 1956, §

3-4-2

; P.L. 1964, ch. 235, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 100, art. 36, § 6; P.L. 1997, ch. 30, art. 35, § 2.

3-4-3.
Importation and payments by division of taxation.

The division of taxation may arrange for the importation and payment of the sale price of the imported article. In case it does so, it shall cause the importation to be made in a manner that it will have an opportunity to examine and inspect the articles imported. All sums paid to the division of taxation, excepting sums for the payment of the sale price, shall be turned over to the general treasurer for the use of the state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1933, ch. 2013, § 39; P.L. 1934, ch. 2088, § 10; G.L. 1938, ch. 164, § 11; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 120; G.L. 1956, §

3-4-3

; P.L. 1996, ch. 100, art. 36, § 6.

3-4-4.
Risk assumed by purchaser.

The only obligation of the division of taxation, if it decides to execute an order pursuant to §

3-4-1

, is to mail the order and the medium of payment for the order in case the division of taxation transmits the means of payment, to inspect the merchandise upon its delivery, and to notify the party ordering the merchandise of its arrival and where it may be found. The leaving with the division of taxation of the order and the making of the payments are taken to be an agreement upon the part of the person desiring the importation to assume all the risks of the transaction, and it is declared that he or she assumes those risks.

History of Section.

P.L. 1933, ch. 2013, § 39; P.L. 1934, ch. 2088, § 10; G.L. 1938, ch. 164, § 11; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 120; G.L. 1956, §

3-4-4

; P.L. 1996, ch. 100, art. 36, § 6.

3-4-5.
Class G licensees exempt.

Nothing contained in §§

3-4-1

—

3-4-4

applies to or affects the rights of holders of Class G licenses to transport within this state, or to import into this state, beverages kept for sale or sold while actually en route in the cars or on the vessels of those licensees.

History of Section.

P.L. 1933, ch. 2013, § 39; P.L. 1934, ch. 2088, § 10; G.L. 1938, ch. 164, § 11; G.L. 1956, §

3-4-5

.

3-4-6.
Penalty for carrying beverages for unlawful sale.

Every express carrier, common carrier, or other person who, for the purpose of carrying to any other person, receives any beverage which has been sold or is intended for sale in violation of this title, having reasonable cause to believe that the beverage has been, or is intended to be sold, shall be fined not more than five hundred dollars ($500) and may be prosecuted for this violation in the city or town where the beverage has been received, or in any city or town through or into which it has been carried.

History of Section.

P.L. 1933, ch. 2013, § 47; G.L. 1938, ch. 170, § 7; P.L. 1976, ch. 180, § 1.

3-4-7.
Waybill or memorandum of shipment required.

Whenever beverages are transported in wholesale quantities as defined in this section from the place where sold for delivery to the purchaser, the person in charge of the vehicle in which the beverage is transported shall, during the transportation, have in his or her possession a waybill or a memorandum from the seller to the purchaser showing the name and address of the seller and of the purchaser and the quantity and character of the beverage sold and transported. Upon the demand of any of the officers mentioned in this title, the person in charge of the transportation shall exhibit the waybill or the memorandum. The provisions of this section apply to interstate transactions insofar as this state, in the exercise of its police powers, may impose them. Any person transporting beverages in violation of this section shall be fined not more than fifty dollars ($50.00) for each offense.

History of Section.

P.L. 1933, ch. 2013, § 51; P.L. 1934, ch. 2088, § 11; G.L. 1938, ch. 170, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

3-4-7

.

3-4-8.
Unlawful sale and shipment.

It shall be unlawful for any person in the business of selling intoxicating beverages in another state or country to ship or cause to be shipped any intoxicating beverage directly to any Rhode Island resident who does not hold a valid wholesaler license issued by the State of Rhode Island. The foregoing shall not apply to any order for intoxicating beverages personally placed by the purchaser at the manufacturer’s premises, for shipment to an address in Rhode Island for nonbusiness purpose. Any shipment of intoxicating beverages pursuant to this section shall contain the language: “Contains Alcohol, Adult Signature (over 21) Required for Delivery.”

Any person who violates subsection (a) of this section shall, for the first offense, be mailed a certified letter by the department ordering that person to cease and desist any shipment of intoxicating beverages to Rhode Island residents and for each subsequent offense shall be fined one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500).

History of Section.

P.L. 2001, ch. 314, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 341, § 1; P.L. 2002, ch. 311, § 1.